Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1324
Arbitration; time limits; extension.

Except as otherwise provided in section 70-1326, the parties may, by mutual written agreement filed with the arbitration board, extend any of the time limits prescribed in sections 70-1301 to 70-1329.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 24.